Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,182
Awards; committee; determination.

Criteria for the award of scholarships under the Student Diversity Scholarship
Program Act shall be determined in
accordance with state and federal law by a committee selected
by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the Board of Trustees
of the Nebraska State Colleges, and the community college boards of governors.
The committee shall include members from
diverse groups and private donors to the endowed scholarship funds.
Awards shall be consistent with the intent stated in the act and with the
constitutions and laws of the United States and the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2000, LB 1379, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 37;

Laws 2009, LB440, § 2.